Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.490

No liability under chapter for act in good faith.

No provision of this chapter imposing any liability applies to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule, form, or order of the director, notwithstanding that the rule or form may later be amended or rescinded or be determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

[ 1959 c 282 s 49.]